hunspell/spanish.aff
SFX N		 da		 da		rastrillada
SFX N		 da		 da		ratada
SFX N		 da		 da		rauda
SFX N		 da		 da		rbonada
SFX N		 da		 da		rda
SFX N		 da		 da		reada
SFX N		 da		 da		reda
SFX N		 da		 da		reida
SFX N		 da		 da		remolienda
SFX N		 da		 da		rentada
SFX N		 da		 da		riada
SFX N		 da		 da		ricada
SFX N		 da		 da		rilada
SFX N		 da		 da		rillada
SFX N		 da		 da		ringada
SFX N		 da		 da		ritada
SFX N		 da		 da		rralada
SFX N		 da		 da		rretada
SFX N		 da		 da		rrinada
SFX N		 da		 da		rronda
SFX N		 da		 das		abalada
SFX N		 da		 das		acetamida
SFX N		 da		 das		achada
SFX N		 da		 das		acharrada
SFX N		 da		 das		acordada
SFX N		 da		 das		ada
SFX N		 da		 das		aguada
SFX N		 da		 da		salada
SFX N		 da		 das		alada
SFX N		 da		 das		alda
SFX N		 da		 das		alizada
SFX N		 da		 das		allegada
SFX N		 da		 das		amarada
SFX N		 da		 das		amida
SFX N		 da		 das		amurada
SFX N		 da		 das		ancada
SFX N		 da		 das		anchada
SFX N		 da		 das		anda
SFX N		 da		 das		anecida
SFX N		 da		 das		ánida
SFX N		 da		 das		anilida
SFX N		 da		 das		ansada
SFX N		 da		 das		apellada
SFX N		 da		 das		arbada
SFX N		 da		 das		arda
SFX N		 da		 das		arida
SFX N		 da		 das		arrada
SFX N		 da		 das		arrancada
SFX N		 da		 das		arrillada
SFX N		 da		 das		artada
SFX N		 da		 das		asada
SFX N		 da		 das		ascada
SFX N		 da		 das		atarrada
SFX N		 da		 das		átida
SFX N		 da		 das		bada
SFX N		 da		 das		barajada
SFX N		 da		 das		barbada
SFX N		 da		 das		bardada
SFX N		 da		 das		bobada
SFX N		 da		 das		bonada
SFX N		 da		 das		briada
SFX N		 da		 das		brigada
SFX N		 da		 das		cada
SFX N		 da		 das		cajada
SFX N		 da		 das		calabazada
SFX N		 da		 das		campada
SFX N		 da		 das		carótida
SFX N		 da		 das		cetada
SFX N		 da		 das		chada
SFX N		 da		 das		charrada
SFX N		 da		 das		chinada
SFX N		 da		 das		chupada
SFX N		 da		 das		collada
SFX N		 da		 das		cordada
SFX N		 da		 das		corvada
SFX N		 da		 das		crecida
SFX N		 da		 das		curda
SFX N		 da		 das		da
SFX N		 da		 das		demanda
SFX N		 da		 das		dentellada
SFX N		 da		 das		derrapada
SFX N		 da		 das		despatarrada
SFX N		 da		 das		donada
SFX N		 da		 das		drada
SFX N		 da		 das		eda
SFX N		 da		 das		egada
SFX N		 da		 das		égida
SFX N		 da		 das		eida
SFX N		 da		 das		eída
SFX N		 da		 das		elada
SFX N		 da		 da		seléucida
SFX N		 da		 das		ellada
SFX N		 da		 das		emedida
SFX N		 da		 das		emida
SFX N		 da		 das		enada
SFX N		 da		 das		enda
SFX N		 da		 das		énida
SFX N		 da		 das		erada
SFX N		 da		 das		espatarrada
SFX N		 da		 das		espermátida
SFX N		 da		 das		estida
SFX N		 da		 das		etada
SFX N		 da		 das		fachada
SFX N		 da		 das		falda
SFX N		 da		 das		fanda
SFX N		 da		 das		fonda
SFX N		 da		 das		frenada
SFX N		 da		 das		gicida
SFX N		 da		 das		gida
SFX N		 da		 das		gonada
SFX N		 da		 das		gualda
SFX N		 da		 das		hada
SFX N		 da		 das		iada
SFX N		 da		 das		icada
SFX N		 da		 das		icida
SFX N		 da		 da		sida
SFX N		 da		 das		ida
SFX N		 da		 das		ienda
SFX N		 da		 das		ierda
SFX N		 da		 das		igada
SFX N		 da		 das		igonada
SFX N		 da		 das		inada
SFX N		 da		 das		inchada
SFX N		 da		 das		inerada
SFX N		 da		 das		ingada
SFX N		 da		 das		irada
SFX N		 da		 das		iscada
SFX N		 da		 das		izquierda
SFX N		 da		 das		lada
SFX N		 da		 das		lda
SFX N		 da		 das		leada
SFX N		 da		 das		legada
SFX N		 da		 das		leída
SFX N		 da		 das		lida
SFX N		 da		 das		limpiada
SFX N		 da		 das		llada
SFX N		 da		 das		lonada
SFX N		 da		 das		lusada
SFX N		 da		 das		manada
SFX N		 da		 das		manda
SFX N		 da		 das		manecida
SFX N		 da		 das		marada
SFX N		 da		 das		mátida
SFX N		 da		 das		mazada
SFX N		 da		 das		medida
SFX N		 da		 das		mida
SFX N		 da		 das		monada
SFX N		 da		 das		morada
SFX N		 da		 das		mpringada
SFX N		 da		 das		murada
SFX N		 da		 das		nada
SFX N		 da		 das		namida
SFX N		 da		 das		ncada
SFX N		 da		 das		necida
SFX N		 da		 das		nerada
SFX N		 da		 das		nevada
SFX N		 da		 das		ngada
SFX N		 da		 das		nida
SFX N		 da		 das		obada
SFX N		 da		 das		olada
SFX N		 da		 das		oleada
SFX N		 da		 das		onada
SFX N		 da		 das		onda
SFX N		 da		 das		ónida
SFX N		 da		 da		sopada
SFX N		 da		 das		orda
SFX N		 da		 das		ordada
SFX N		 da		 das		ornada
SFX N		 da		 das		orralada
SFX N		 da		 das		orterada
SFX N		 da		 das		osonda
SFX N		 da		 das		ótida
SFX N		 da		 das		pada
SFX N		 da		 das		panda
SFX N		 da		 das		pedida
SFX N		 da		 das		piada
SFX N		 da		 das		pida
SFX N		 da		 das		polada
SFX N		 da		 das		poleada
SFX N		 da		 das		potrada
SFX N		 da		 das		pringada
SFX N		 da		 das		queda
SFX N		 da		 das		quetada
SFX N		 da		 das		rajada
SFX N		 da		 das		ralada
SFX N		 da		 das		ranada
SFX N		 da		 das		rancada
SFX N		 da		 das		ratada
SFX N		 da		 das		rda
SFX N		 da		 das		recida
SFX N		 da		 das		reda
SFX N		 da		 das		regicida
SFX N		 da		 das		remolienda
SFX N		 da		 das		renada
SFX N		 da		 das		rentada
SFX N		 da		 das		riada
SFX N		 da		 das		ricada
SFX N		 da		 das		rida
SFX N		 da		 das		rigada
SFX N		 da		 das		rillada
SFX N		 da		 das		ringada
SFX N		 da		 das		riscada
SFX N		 da		 das		rralada
SFX N		 da		 das		rretada
SFX N		 da		 das		rrinada
SFX N		 da		 das		sasánida
SFX N		 da		 das		scada
SFX N		 da		 das		senada
SFX N		 da		 das		sombrerada
SFX N		 da		 das		sonda
SFX N		 da		 das		sopada
SFX N		 da		 das		stida
SFX N		 da		 das		tacada
SFX N		 da		 das		tarascada
SFX N		 da		 das		telada
SFX N		 da		 das		tellada
SFX N		 da		 das		tenada
SFX N		 da		 das		tetada
SFX N		 da		 da		stida
SFX N		 da		 das		tida
SFX N		 da		 da		strada
SFX N		 da		 das		trida
SFX N		 da		 das		uada
SFX N		 da		 das		uarda
SFX N		 da		 das		udada
SFX N		 da		 das		ueda
SFX N		 da		 das		uetada
SFX N		 da		 das		ugada
SFX N		 da		 das		ulgada
SFX N		 da		 das		ullada
SFX N		 da		 das		unda
SFX N		 da		 das		upada
SFX N		 da		 das		urada
SFX N		 da		 das		urda
SFX N		 da		 das		úrda
SFX N		 da		 das		usada
SFX N		 da		 das		znada
SFX N		 da		 das		zolada
SFX N		 da		 da		tarda
SFX N		 da		 da		tenada
SFX N		 da		 da		tetada
SFX N		 da		 da		tétrada
SFX N		 da		 da		tida
SFX N		 da		 da		trada
SFX N		 da		 da		trillada
SFX N		 da		 da		uada
SFX N		 da		 da		ucida
SFX N		 da		 da		uda
SFX N		 da		 da		uetada
SFX N		 da		 da		ugada
SFX N		 da		 da		ulgada
SFX N		 da		 da		ullada
SFX N		 da		 da		umada
SFX N		 da		 da		unda
SFX N		 da		 da		upada
SFX N		 da		 da		urada
SFX N		 da		 da		úrda
SFX N		 da		 da		znada
SFX N		 d		 d		d
SFX N		 d		 des		d
SFX N		 d		 ds		d
SFX N		 de		 de		ade
SFX N		 de		 de		alde
SFX N		 de		 de		almorávide
SFX N		 de		 de		átide
SFX N		 de		 de		coloide
SFX N		 de		 de		deslinde
SFX N		 de		 de		ede
SFX N		 de		 de		eoide
SFX N		 de		 de		erde
SFX N		 de		 de		ide
SFX N		 de		 de		lde
SFX N		 de		 de		linde
SFX N		 de		 de		loide
SFX N		 de		 de		oide
SFX N		 de		 de		olde
SFX N		 de		 de		oloide
SFX N		 de		 de		rde
SFX N		 de		 de		roide
SFX N		 de		 de		romboide
SFX N		 de		 des		alde
SFX N		 de		 des		almorávide
SFX N		 de		 des		antropoide
SFX N		 de		 des		átide
SFX N		 de		 des		boide
SFX N		 de		 des		coide
SFX N		 de		 des		conde
SFX N		 de		 des		ede
SFX N		 de		 des		elde
SFX N		 de		 des		erde
SFX N		 de		 des		éride
SFX N		 de		 de		side
SFX N		 de		 des		ide
SFX N		 de		 des		lde
SFX N		 de		 des		loide
SFX N		 de		 des		minoide
SFX N		 de		 des		noide
SFX N		 de		 de		soide
SFX N		 de		 des		oide
SFX N		 de		 des		olde
SFX N		 de		 des		oloide
SFX N		 de		 des		onde
SFX N		 de		 des		ride
SFX N		 de		 des		roide
SFX N		 de		 des		sede
SFX N		 de		 des		soide
SFX N		 de		 des		tade
SFX N		 de		 des		vide
SFX N		 de		 des		zoide
SFX N		 de		 de		zoide
SFX N		 dia		 di		arcadia
SFX N		 di		 di		adi
SFX N		 dí		 dí		andí
SFX N		 dí		 dí		dí
SFX N		 dí		 dí		edí
SFX N		 dí		 díes		andí
SFX N		 dí		 díes		dí
SFX N		 dí		 díes		ndí
SFX N		 dí		 dís		andí
SFX N		 dí		 dís		dí
SFX N		 dí		 díses		dí
SFX N		 dí		 dís		udí
SFX N		 do		 da		aciado
SFX N		 do		 da		aconsejado
SFX N		 do		 da		amorado
SFX N		 do		 da		argado
SFX N		 do		 da		bardo
